Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4061
Appointed agent; requirements; fees.

(1) An insurance producer shall not act as an agent of an insurer unless the insurance producer becomes an appointed agent of that insurer. An insurance producer who is not acting as an agent of an insurer is not required to become appointed.

(2) To appoint an insurance producer as its agent, the appointing insurer shall file, in a format approved by the director, a notice of appointment within fifteen days from the date the agency contract is executed or the first insurance application is submitted. An insurer may also elect to appoint an insurance producer to all or some insurers within the insurer's holding company system or group by the filing of a single appointment request.

(3) An insurer shall pay an appointment fee, in the amount and method of payment set forth in section 44-4064, for each insurance producer appointed by the insurer.

(4) An insurer shall remit, in a manner prescribed by the director, a renewal appointment fee in the amount set forth in section 44-4064.

Laws 2001, LB 51, § 15.